Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-144
Hitchcock.

The county of Hitchcock shall contain that territory described as townships one, two, three and four, north, of ranges thirty-one, thirty-two, thirty-three, thirty-four and thirty-five, west.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 65, p. 225;

R.S.1913, § 857;

C.S.1922, § 759;

C.S.1929, § 25-146;

R.S.1943, § 22-144.